District of Columbia statutes.
2-605

Judicial notice.

All courts within the District of Columbia shall take judicial notice of the acts and resolutions published in the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large.

History

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title II, § 207, 22 DCR 2063
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 6(c), 25 DCR 6960

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1605.
1973 Ed., § 1-1605.